Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-953
Subject's rights; compulsory process to obtain testimony of witnesses.

A subject shall be entitled to compulsory process to obtain the testimony of witnesses in his or her favor.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 67;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1057;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 73.